District of Columbia statutes.
1-1324

Deficiency or excess in measurement of square.

Whenever the Surveyor or a registered land surveyor shall lay off any lot, or any parts into which a square or lot may be subdivided, as provided in this chapter, the Surveyor or a registered land surveyor shall measure the whole of that front of the square on which said lot or part lies, and if, on such admeasurement, the whole front of the square exceeds or falls short of the aggregate of the fronts of the lots on that side of the square, as the same are recorded, the Surveyor or a registered land surveyor shall, except in that portion of the City of Washington included within the limits of what formerly constituted the City of Georgetown, apportion such excess or deficiency among the lots or pieces on that front agreeably to their respective dimensions; and in that portion of the City of Washington included within the limits of what formerly constituted the City of Georgetown, the Surveyor or a registered land surveyor shall allow such excess or charge such deficiency to the highest numbered original lot on that front of the square, or apportion such excess or deficiency among any lots into which such highest numbered original lot may have been subdivided: provided, that wherever in the former City of Georgetown a square or block of land is intersected by the division line between 2 original additions to said City, the excess or deficiency found between the street lines and said division line shall be applied to the highest numbered original lot on each side of said division line, or apportioned among any lots into which such highest numbered original lot may have been subdivided.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1425, ch. 854, § 1585
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 544, ch. 1329
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 5005(d), 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 114, 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-924.
1973 Ed., § 1-624.
D.C. Law 13-91 inserted “a” following “Whenever the Surveyor or”, substituted “City of Georgetown, the Surveyor” for “City of Georgetown the Surveyor”, and validated previously made technical amendments.